Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,263
Environmental Safety Act; terms, defined.

For purposes of the Environmental Safety Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; and

(2) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 2021, LB148, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 443.